Utah statutes.
72-4-112.   State highways -- SR-61 to SR-68 and SR-70.
State highways include:
(1)  SR-61.  From Route 23 in Cornish easterly to Route 91 at Webster
Junction.
(2)  SR-62.  From Route 89 south of Junction easterly through Kingston to near
Otter Creek Reservoir; then northerly to Route 24 at Plateau Junction.
(3)  SR-63.  From Bryce National Park north boundary northerly to Tropic
Junction on Route 12.
(4)  SR-64.  From Route 15 south of Holden northerly to Route 50.
(5)  SR-65.  From Route 80 near Mt. Dell Reservoir northeasterly on the
Brigham Young Memorial Highway to Henefer; then northeasterly to Route 84.
(6)  SR-66.  From Route 65 near East Canyon Reservoir northerly through
Porterville to Route 84 in Morgan.
(7)  SR-67.  From the junction of I-215 in Davis County northerly on Legacy
Parkway to the junction with US-89 and I-15.
(8)  SR-68.  From Route 6 at Elberta northerly on Redwood Road and Fifth South
Street in Bountiful; then southerly on 2nd West in Bountiful to Route 89 in
Bountiful.
(9)  SR-70.  From Route 15 near Cove Fort to the Utah-Colorado state line west
of Grand Junction, Colorado, on interstate Route 70.
